Utah statutes.
78B-3-310.   Court to which transfer is to be made.
An action or proceeding which is transferred by order of the court shall be
transferred to a court agreed upon by the parties.  If the parties do not
agree, the action shall be transferred to the nearest court where the
objection or reason for transfer does not exist.
